Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3704
Dialysis patient care technician; powers.

A dialysis patient care technician may administer hemodialysis under the authority of a registered nurse licensed pursuant to the Nurse Practice Act who may delegate tasks based on nursing judgment to a dialysis patient care technician based on the technician’s education, knowledge, training, and skill.

Laws 2017, LB255, § 4.

Nurse Practice Act, see section 38-2201.